Maryland, session 2025, SB0708.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–17.
(d) A sports wagering licensee or sports wagering operator that advertises in the
State [may] SHALL contract with an independent evaluator licensed under subsection (b)
of this section to evaluate and rate the sports wagering licensee’s sports wagering content,
sports wagering experts, sports wagering influencers, and content partners.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0708*

SENATE BILL 708
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 1 of this Act is
contingent on the State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission issuing licenses as
required under § 9–1E–17 of the State Government Article to at least three independent
evaluators.
SECTION 2. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
July 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.